Utah statutes.
58-73-304.   Exemptions from licensure.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the exemptions from licensure set
forth in Section 58-1-307 apply.
(2)  With regard to Subsections 58-1-307(1)(b) and (c), the only exemption
from licensure permitted is a preceptorship which may permit a student to
engage in acts or practices included within the definition of the practice of
chiropractic, while:
(a)  performing the duties and activities which are part of the approved
program of education and training of a college or university accredited by the
Council on Chiropractic Education; and
(b)  under a form of supervision approved by the division.
(3)  In addition to the exemptions provided in Subsections (1) and (2), a
chiropractic assistant while working under the supervision of a licensed
chiropractic physician is exempt from licensure under this chapter to the
extent the chiropractic assistant is engaged in tasks appropriately delegated
by the supervisor in accordance with the standards and ethics of the practice
of chiropractic and division rule established in collaboration with the board.
